Utah statutes.
78B-15-306.   Proceeding for rescission.

(1)  A signatory may rescind a declaration of paternity or denial of paternity by filing a voluntary rescission document with the Office of Vital Records in a form prescribed by the office before the earlier of:

(a)  60 days after the effective date of the declaration or denial, as provided in Sections 78B-15-303 and 78B-15-304; or

(b)  the date of notice of the first adjudicative proceeding to which the signatory is a party, before a tribunal to adjudicate an issue relating to the child, including a proceeding that establishes support.

(2)  Upon receiving a voluntary rescission document from a signatory under Subsection (1), the Office of Vital Records shall provide notice of the rescission, by mail, to the other signatory at the last-known address of that signatory.

